Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB731.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 501. Short title of chapter.This chapter may be referred to as the Pharmaceutical Assistance Contract for the Elderly Act.Section 2. Section 501 of the act is renumbered to read:Section [501] 501.1. Legislative findings.<--123456789101112131415161718192021 Finding that an increasing number of the Commonwealth's elderly citizens who are living on fixed incomes are experiencing difficulties in meeting the costs of life-sustaining prescription drugs, the General Assembly, in its responsibilities to provide for the health, welfare and safety of the residents of this Commonwealth, hereby continues a limited State pharmaceutical assistance program for the elderly.Section 3. Section 503(b) of the act is amended to read:SECTION 3. SECTIONS 503(B) AND 519(B) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:Section 503. Determination of eligibility.* * *(b) Social Security cost-of-living adjustment.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act to the contrary, persons who, as of December 31, [2022] 2024, are enrolled in the PACENET program shall remain eligible for the PACENET program if the maximum income limit is exceeded due solely to a Social Security cost-of-living adjustment.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act to the contrary, persons who, as of December 31, [2022] 2024, are enrolled in the PACE program shall remain eligible for the PACE program if the maximum income limit is exceeded due solely to a Social Security cost-of-living adjustment.(3) Eligibility in the PACE or PACENET program pursuant to this subsection shall expire on December 31, [2025] 2027.SECTION 519. THE PHARMACEUTICAL ASSISTANCE CONTRACT FOR THE ELDERLY NEEDS ENHANCEMENT TIER.* * *(B) PACENET ELIGIBILITY.--A PERSON WITH AN ANNUAL INCOME OF NOT LESS THAN $14,500 AND NOT MORE THAN [$33,500] $45,000 IN THE 20250SB0731PN1308 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CASE OF A SINGLE PERSON AND OF NOT LESS THAN $17,700 AND NOT MORE THAN [$41,500] $55,000 IN THE CASE OF THE COMBINED INCOME OF PERSONS MARRIED TO EACH OTHER SHALL BE ELIGIBLE FOR ENHANCED PHARMACEUTICAL ASSISTANCE UNDER THIS SECTION. A PERSON MAY, IN REPORTING INCOME TO THE DEPARTMENT, ROUND THE AMOUNT OF EACH SOURCE OF INCOME AND THE INCOME TOTAL TO THE NEAREST WHOLE DOLLAR, WHEREBY ANY AMOUNT WHICH IS LESS THAN 50¢ IS ELIMINATED.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately. AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 519(B) OF THE ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT JULY 1, 2026.(2) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250SB0731PN1308 - 3 - <--1234567891011121314